Alabama, session 2026rs, HB199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The boundary lines and corporate limits of
the Town of Morris in Jefferson County are altered,
rearranged, and extended to include within the corporate
limits of the municipality, in addition to the lands now
included, all of the following territory:
BEG NW COR OF NW¼ OF SE¼ SEC 3 TP 15 SR 3W THW 235 FT
TH N 283.9 FT TO S/L SARDIS RD TH NELY ALG ROW 665.6 FT TH
SELY ALG ROW 1247.1 FT TH S 445.7 FT TH W 520 FT TH N 500 FT
TO POB SECT 03 TWSP 15S RANGE 3W
Section 2. In accordance with Section 11-42-6 of the
Code of Alabama 1975, a map showing the proposed territory to
be altered, rearranged, and extended from the Town of Morris
is on file and open to public inspection in the Office of the
Judge of Probate in Jefferson County, Alabama.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB199 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 22-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 10-Feb-26 Passed



Page 2